en: Utility Carts
xx: Utility Carts
cs: Pomocné vozíky
da: Udstyrsvogne
de: Mehrzweckwagen
es: Carritos multiusos
fr: Chariots multi-usages
it: Carrelli portatutto
ja: 多目的ワゴン
nl: Transportwagentjes
no: Nyttevogner
pl: Wózki uniwersalne
pt: Carrinhos utilitários
ru: Хозяйственные тележки
sv: Utrustningsvagnar
tr: Çok Amaçlı El Arabaları

en: Office Equipment
xx: Office Equipment
cs: Kancelářské vybavení
da: Kontorudstyr
de: Bürogeräte
es: Equipos para oficina
fr: Équipement de bureau
it: Dotazione per l'ufficio
ja: オフィス機器
nl: Kantoorapparaten
no: Kontorutstyr
pl: Sprzęt biurowy
pt: Equipamento para escritório
ru: Офисное оборудование
sv: Kontorsutrustning
tr: Ofis Ekipmanları

en: Calculator Accessories
xx: Calculator Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke kalkulačkám
da: Tilbehør til lommeregnere
de: Taschenrechner-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para calculadoras
fr: Accessoires pour calculatrices
it: Accessori per calcolatrici
ja: 電卓関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor rekenmachines
no: Tilbehør til kalkulatorer
pl: Akcesoria do kalkulatorów
pt: Acessórios para calculadora
ru: Принадлежности для калькуляторов
sv: Räknartillbehör
tr: Hesap Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Calculators
xx: Calculators
cs: Kalkulačky
da: Regnemaskiner
de: Taschenrechner
es: Calculadoras
fr: Calculatrices, Calculatrice
it: Calcolatrici
ja: 電卓
nl: Rekenmachines
no: Kalkulatorer
pl: Kalkulatory
pt: Calculadoras
ru: Калькуляторы
sv: Räknemaskiner
tr: Hesap Makineleri

en: Basic Calculators
xx: Basic Calculators
cs: Základní kalkulačky
da: Almindelige lommeregnere
de: Einfache Taschenrechner
es: Calculadoras básicas
fr: Calculatrices basiques
it: Calcolatrici base
ja: 一般電卓
nl: Bureaurekenmachines
no: Enkle kalkulatorer
pl: Kalkulatory podstawowe
pt: Calculadoras simples
ru: Простые калькуляторы
sv: Miniräknare
tr: Standart Hesap Makineleri

en: Construction Calculators
xx: Construction Calculators
cs: Kalkulačky pro stavebnictví
da: Konstruktionslommeregnere
de: Taschenrechner für den Bau
es: Calculadoras de construcción
fr: Calculatrices pour la construction
it: Calcolatrici per l'edilizia
ja: 建築向け電卓
nl: Bouwrekenmachines
no: Tekniske kalkulatorer
pl: Kalkulatory budowlane
pt: Calculadoras de construção
ru: Строительные калькуляторы
sv: Byggräknare
tr: İnşaat Hesap Makineleri

en: Financial Calculators
xx: Financial Calculators
cs: Finanční kalkulačky
da: Finansielle lommeregnere
de: Finanz-Taschenrechner
es: Calculadoras financieras
fr: Calculatrices financières
it: Calcolatrici finanziarie
ja: 金融電卓
nl: Financiële rekenmachines
no: Finanskalkulatorer
pl: Kalkulatory finansowe
pt: Calculadoras financeiras
ru: Финансовые калькуляторы
sv: Finansräknare
tr: Finansal Hesap Makineleri

en: Graphing Calculators
xx: Graphing Calculators
cs: Grafové kalkulačky
da: Graflommeregnere
de: Grafikfähige Taschenrechner
es: Calculadoras gráficas
fr: Calculatrices graphiques
it: Calcolatrici grafiche
ja: グラフ電卓
nl: Grafische rekenmachines
no: Grafiske kalkulatorer
pl: Kalkulatory graficzne
pt: Calculadoras gráficas
ru: Графические калькуляторы
sv: Grafräknare
tr: Grafik Hesap Makineleri

en: Scientific Calculators
xx: Scientific Calculators
cs: Vědecké kalkulačky
da: Videnskabelige lommeregnere
de: Wissenschaftliche Taschenrechner
es: Calculadoras científicas
fr: Calculatrices scientifiques
it: Calcolatrici scientifiche
ja: 関数電卓
nl: Wetenschappelijke rekenmachines
no: Vitenskapelige kalkulatorer
pl: Kalkulatory naukowe
pt: Calculadoras científicas
ru: Инженерные калькуляторы
sv: Teknikräknare
tr: Bilimsel Hesap Makineleri

en: Electronic Dictionaries & Translators
xx: Electronic Dictionaries & Translators
cs: Elektronické slovníky a překladače
da: Elektroniske ordbøger og oversættere
de: Elektronische Wörterbücher & Übersetzungsgeräte
es: Traductores y diccionarios electrónicos
fr: Dictionnaires et traducteurs électroniques
it: Dizionari e traduttori elettronici
ja: 電子辞書
nl: Elektronische woordenboeken en vertaalcomputers
no: Elektroniske ordbøker og oversettere
pl: Słowniki i translatory elektroniczne
pt: Dicionários e tradutores eletrônicos
ru: Электронные словари и переводчики
sv: Elektroniska ordböcker och översättare
tr: Elektronik Sözlükler ve Çevirmenler

en: Label Makers
xx: Label Makers
cs: Štítkovače
da: Labelmaskiner
de: Etikettendrucker
es: Etiquetadoras
fr: Étiqueteuses
it: Etichettatrici
ja: ラベルプリンター
nl: Labelmakers
no: Etikettmaskiner
pl: Drukarki do etykiet
pt: Impressoras de etiquetas
ru: Машинки для печати этикеток
sv: Präglingsapparater
tr: Etiketleme Makineleri

en: Laminators
xx: Laminators
cs: Laminátory
da: Lamineringsmaskiner
de: Laminiergeräte
es: Plastificadoras
fr: Plastifieuses
it: Laminatori
ja: ラミネーター
nl: Lamineerapparaten
no: Lamineringsmaskiner
pl: Laminatory
pt: Laminadores
ru: Ламинаторы
sv: Laminatorer
tr: Laminasyon Makineleri

en: Office Shredders
xx: Office Shredders
cs: Skartovačky
da: Makuleringsmaskiner
de: Aktenvernichter
es: Trituradoras de papel
fr: Destructeurs de documents
it: Distruggidocumenti
ja: シュレッダー
nl: Papierversnipperaars
no: Makuleringsmaskiner
pl: Niszczarki
pt: Picadores
ru: Офисные шредеры
sv: Dokumentförstörare
tr: Evrak İmha Makineleri

en: Postage Meters
xx: Postage Meters
cs: Frankovací přístroje
da: Portomaskiner
de: Frankiermaschinen
es: Máquinas franqueadoras
fr: Affranchisseuses
it: Affrancatrici
ja: 郵便料金計器
nl: Frankeermachines
no: Frankeringsmaskiner
pl: Frankownice
pt: Máquinas de franquear
ru: Франкировальные машины
sv: Frankeringsmaskiner
tr: Posta Pulu Yapıştırma Makineleri

en: Time & Attendance Clocks
xx: Time & Attendance Clocks
cs: Zařízení na sledování docházky
da: Stempelure
de: Stempeluhren
es: Relojes de fichar
fr: Horloges et pointeuses
it: Macchine timbracartellini
ja: タイムレコーダー
nl: Tijd- en prikklokken
no: Stemplingsur
pl: Rejestratory czasu pracy
pt: Relógios de ponto
ru: Часы для учёта рабочего времени
sv: Tids- och närvaroklockor
tr: Süre ve Katılım Saatleri

en: Transcribers & Dictation Systems
xx: Transcribers & Dictation Systems
cs: Přepisovače a diktovací systémy
da: Transskribering og diktafoner
de: Diktiergeräte & Geräte zur Transkription
es: Transcriptores y sistemas de dictados
fr: Transcripteurs et dictaphones
it: Trascrittori e sistemi di dettatura
ja: 転写機
nl: Transcriptieapparaten en dictafoons
no: Avskrivere og diktatsystemer
pl: Transkrybery i systemy dyktowania
pt: Transcritores e sistemas de ditado
ru: Стенографические системы
sv: Transkriberare och diktationssystem
tr: Transkripsiyon ve Dikte Sistemleri

en: Typewriters
xx: Typewriters
cs: Psací stroje
da: Skrivemaskiner
de: Schreibmaschinen
es: Máquinas de escribir
fr: Machines à écrire
it: Macchine da scrivere
ja: タイプライター
nl: Typemachines
no: Skrivemaskiner
pl: Maszyny do pisania
pt: Máquinas de escrever
ru: Пишущие машинки
sv: Skrivmaskiner
tr: Daktilolar

en: Office Instruments
xx: Office Instruments
cs: Kancelářské nástroje
da: Kontorredskaber
de: Büroarbeitsmittel
es: Artículos de oficina
fr: Accessoires de bureau
it: Strumenti per ufficio
ja: 事務用品
nl: Kantoorbenodigdheden
no: Kontorinstrumenter
pl: Akcesoria biurowe
pt: Instrumentos de escritório
ru: Офисные принадлежности
sv: Kontorsinstrument
tr: Ofis Aletleri

en: Call Bells
xx: Call Bells
cs: Zvonky
da: Klokker
de: Tischglocken
es: Timbres de recepción
fr: Sonnettes de comptoir
it: Campanelli di chiamata
ja: 呼び鈴
nl: Baliebellen
no: Varselklokker
pl: Dzwonki recepcyjne
pt: Sinetas
ru: Сигнальные звонки
sv: Ringklockor
tr: Çağrı Zilleri

en: Clipboards
xx: Clipboards
cs: Záznamové desky
da: Skriveplader med klemme
de: Klemmbretter
es: Portapapeles
fr: Bloc-notes
it: Portablocco
ja: クリップボード
nl: Klemborden
no: Skriveplater
pl: Podkładki do pisania
pt: Pranchetas
ru: Планшеты
sv: Skrivplattor
tr: Klipsli Kağıt Altlıkları